District of Columbia statutes.
32-508

Investigative authority.

(a)

An employer shall develop, maintain, and make available to the Mayor records regarding the employer’s activities related to this chapter that the Mayor may prescribe by rule.

(b)

To ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter, the Mayor, consistent with constitutional guidelines, may:

(1)

Investigate and gather data regarding any wage, hour, condition, or practice of employment related to this chapter; and

(2)

Enter or inspect any place of employment or record required by this chapter.

(c)

For the purpose of any investigation provided for in this section, the Mayor may exercise the subpoena authority provided in § 1-301.21.

Oct. 3, 1990, D.C. Law 8-181, § 9, 37 DCR 5043
1981 Ed., § 36-1308.